test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjectives_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Adjective - ger - ok : # singular declensions for vyras
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom: geras 
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Gen: gero
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Dat: geram
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Acc: gerą
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Ins: geru
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Loc: gerame
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Nom: geri  
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Gen: gerų
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Dat: geriems
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Acc: gerus
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Ins: gerais
    ger+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Loc: geruose
